Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.190

Duties of attorney general.

The attorney general shall render to the director opinions upon all questions of law relating to the construction or interpretation of this chapter, or arising in the administration thereof that may be submitted by the director, and shall act as attorney for the director in all actions and proceedings brought by or against the director under or pursuant to any provisions of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 30 s 21; 1989 c 414 s 23.]